California statutes. Insurance Code
(d) If the provider does not receive the payment from the insured within 60 days of the notice to the insured, or within one year after initial billing for the service, whichever is later, the insurer’s share of cost in possession of the insured that has not been paid to the provider may be reported to a credit reporting agency as medical debt and shall not be considered medical debt for purposes of Sections 1785.13, 1785.20.6, 1785.27, and 1786.18 of the Civil Code if both of the following are true:

(1) The entity reporting the information has adequate documentation to
 substantiate that the insured actually received the funds from the insurer.

(2) The insured has not raised a dispute with the insurer, provider, or department as to whether the amount was received.

(e) This section does not limit existing requirements under this chapter protecting insureds from balance billing, including Sections 10112.8 and 10126.66.

(f) This section does not apply if the direct payment for services provided to the insured is a reimbursement from the insurer because the insured paid the insurer’s share of cost obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 520, Sec. 11.   (SB 1061)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.8.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2017, that provides benefits through contracts with providers at alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133, shall provide that if an insured receives covered services from a contracting health facility at which, or as a result of which, the insured receives services provided by a noncontracting individual health professional, the insured shall pay no more than the same cost sharing that the insured would pay for the same covered services received from a contracting individual health professional. This amount shall be referred to as the “in-network cost-sharing amount.”

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an insured shall not owe the noncontracting individual health professional more than the in-network cost-sharing amount for services subject to this section. At the time of payment by the insurer to the noncontracting individual health professional, the insurer shall inform the insured and the noncontracting individual health professional of the in-network cost-sharing amount owed by the insured.

(3) A noncontracting individual health professional shall not bill or collect any amount from the insured for services subject to this section except the in-network cost-sharing amount. Any communication from the noncontracting individual health professional to the insured prior to the receipt of information about the in-network cost-sharing
 amount pursuant to paragraph (2) shall include a notice in 12-point bold type stating that the communication is not a bill and informing the insured that the insured shall not pay until they are informed by their insurer of any applicable cost sharing.

(4) (A) If the noncontracting individual health professional has received more than the in-network cost-sharing amount from the insured for services subject to this section, the noncontracting individual health professional shall refund any overpayment to the insured within 30 calendar days after receiving payment from the insured.

(B) If the noncontracting individual health professional does not refund any overpayment to the insured within 30 calendar days after being informed of the insured’s in-network
 cost-sharing amount, interest shall accrue at the rate of 15 percent per annum beginning with the date payment was received from the insured.

(C) A noncontracting individual health professional shall automatically include in their refund to the insured all interest that has accrued pursuant to this section without requiring the insured to submit a request for the interest amount.

(b) Except for services subject to subdivision (c), the following shall apply:

(1) Any cost sharing paid by the insured for the services subject to this section shall count toward the limit on annual out-of-pocket expenses established under Section 10112.28.

(2) Cost sharing arising
 from services subject to this section shall be counted toward any deductible in the same manner as cost sharing would be attributed to a contracting individual health professional.

(3) The cost sharing paid by the insured pursuant to this section shall satisfy the insured’s obligation to pay cost sharing for the health service and shall constitute “applicable cost sharing owed by the insured.”

(c) For services subject to this section, if an insured has an insurance contract that includes coverage for out-of-network benefits, a noncontracting individual health professional may bill or collect from the insured the out-of-network cost sharing, if applicable, only when the insured consents in writing and that written consent demonstrates satisfaction of all the following criteria:

(1) At least 24 hours in advance of care, the insured shall consent in writing to receive services from the identified noncontracting individual health professional.

(2) The consent shall be obtained by the noncontracting individual health professional in a document that is separate from the document used to obtain the consent for any other part of the care or procedure. The consent shall not be obtained by the facility or any representative of the facility. The consent shall not be obtained at the time of admission or at any time when the enrollee is being prepared for surgery or any other procedure.

(3) At the time consent is provided the noncontracting individual health professional shall give the insured a written
 estimate of the insured’s total out-of-pocket cost of care. The written estimate shall be based on the professional’s billed charges for the service to be provided. The noncontracting individual health professional shall not attempt to collect more than the estimated amount without receiving separate written consent from the insured or the insured’s authorized representative, unless circumstances arise during delivery of services that were unforeseeable at the time the estimate was given that would require the provider to change the estimate.

(4) The consent shall advise the insured that they may elect to seek care from a contracted provider or may contact the insured’s insurer in order to arrange to receive the health service from a contracted provider for lower out-of-pocket costs.

(5) The consent and estimate shall be provided to the insured in the language spoken by the insured, if the language is a Medi-Cal threshold language, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 128552 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) The consent shall also advise the insured that any costs incurred as a result of the insured’s use of the out-of-network benefit shall be in addition to in-network cost-sharing amounts and may not count toward the annual out-of-pocket maximum on in-network benefits or a deductible, if any, for in-network benefits.

(d) A noncontracting individual health professional who fails to comply with provisions of this subdivision has not obtained written consent for purposes of this section. Under those circumstances, subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply
 and subdivision (c) shall not apply.

(e) (1) A noncontracting individual health professional may advance to collections only the in-network cost-sharing amount, as determined by the insurer pursuant to subdivision (a) or the out-of-network cost-sharing amount owed pursuant to subdivision (c), that the insured has failed to pay.

(2) The noncontracting individual health professional, or any entity acting on their behalf, including any assignee of the debt, shall not do either of the following:

(A) Report adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency.

(B) Commence civil action against the insured for a minimum of 150
 days after the initial billing regarding amounts owed by the insured under subdivision (a) or (c).

(3) With respect to an insured, a noncontracting individual health professional, or any entity acting on their behalf, including any assignee of the debt, shall not use wage garnishments or liens on primary residences as a means of collecting unpaid bills under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section and Sections 10112.81 and 10112.82, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Contracting health facility” means a health facility that is contracted with the insured’s health insurer to provide services under the insured’s policy. A contracting health care facility includes, but is not limited to, the following
 providers:

(A) A licensed hospital.

(B) An ambulatory surgery or other outpatient setting, as described in subdivision (a), (d), (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A laboratory.

(D) A radiology or imaging center.

(2) “Cost sharing” includes any copayment, coinsurance, or deductible, or any other form of cost sharing paid by the insured other than premium or share of premium.

(3) “Individual health professional” means a physician and surgeon or other professional who is licensed by the state to deliver or
 furnish health care services. For this purpose, an “individual health professional” shall not include a dentist, licensed pursuant to the Dental Practice Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code).

(4) “In-network cost-sharing amount” means an amount no more than the same cost sharing the insured would pay for the same covered service received from a contracting health professional. The in-network cost-sharing amount with respect to an insured with coinsurance shall be based on the amount paid by the insurer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10112.82.

(5) “Noncontracting individual health professional” means a physician and surgeon or other professional who is licensed by the state to deliver or furnish health
 care services and who is not contracted with the insured’s health insurance product. For this purpose, a “noncontracting individual health professional” shall not include a dentist, licensed pursuant to the Dental Practice Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code). Application of this definition is not precluded by a noncontracting individual health professional’s affiliation with a group.

(g) This section shall not be construed to require an insurer to cover services not required by law or by the terms and conditions of the health insurance policy.

(h) If a health insurer delegates payment functions to a contracted entity, including, but not limited to, a medical group or independent practice association, the
 delegated entity shall comply with this section.

(i) This section shall not apply to emergency services and care, as defined in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 520, Sec. 12.   (SB 1061)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.81.

(a) (1) By September 1, 2017, the commissioner shall establish an independent dispute resolution process for the purpose of processing and resolving a claim dispute between a health insurer and a noncontracting individual health professional for services subject to subdivision (a) of Section 10112.8.

(2) Prior to initiating the independent dispute resolution process, the parties shall complete the insurer’s internal process.

(3) If either the noncontracting individual health professional or the insurer appeals a claim to the department’s independent dispute resolution process, the other party shall participate in the appeal process as described in this section.

(b) (1) The commissioner shall establish uniform written procedures for the submission, receipt, processing, and resolution of claim payment disputes pursuant to this section and any other guidelines for implementing this section. These procedures shall include a process for each party to submit into evidence information that will be kept confidential from the other party, in order to preserve the confidentiality of the source contract.

(2) The commissioner shall establish reasonable and necessary fees for the purpose of administering this section, to be paid by both parties.

(3) In establishing the independent dispute resolution process, the commissioner shall permit the bundling of claims
 submitted to the same insurer or the same delegated entity for the same or similar services by the same noncontracting individual health professional.

(4) The commissioner shall permit a physician group, independent practice association, or other entity authorized to act on behalf of a noncontracting individual health professional to initiate and participate in the independent dispute resolution process.

(5) (A) In deciding the dispute, the independent organization shall conduct a de novo review and base its decision regarding the
 appropriate reimbursement on the information and documents timely submitted into evidence by the parties to the dispute.

(B) The independent organization shall assign reviewers to each case based on their relevant education, background, and medical claims payment and clinical experience.

(c) (1) The commissioner may contract with one or more independent organizations to conduct the proceedings. The independent organization handling a dispute shall be independent of either party to the dispute.

(2) The commissioner shall establish conflict-of-interest standards, consistent with the purposes
 of this section, that an organization shall meet in order to qualify to administer the independent dispute resolution program. The conflict-of-interest standards shall be consistent with the standards pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 10169.2.

(3) The commissioner may contract with the same independent organization or organizations as the State Department of Managed Health Care.

(4) The commissioner shall provide, upon the request of an interested person, a copy of all nonproprietary information, as determined by the commissioner, filed with the department by an independent organization seeking to contract with the department to administer the independent dispute resolution process pursuant to this section. The department may charge a nominal fee to cover the costs of providing a copy of the information pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) Contracts entered into pursuant to the authority in this subdivision shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Government Code and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(d) The decision obtained through the commissioner’s independent dispute resolution process shall be binding on both parties. The insurer shall implement the decision obtained through the independent dispute resolution process. If dissatisfied, either party may pursue any right, remedy, or penalty established under any other applicable law.

(e) If a health insurer delegates payment functions to a contracted entity,
 including, but not limited to, a medical group or independent practice association, then the delegated entity shall comply with this section.

(f) This section shall not apply to emergency services and care, as defined in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) The definitions in subdivision (f) of Section 10112.8 shall apply for purposes of this section.

(h) This section shall not be construed to alter a health insurer’s obligations pursuant to Section 10123.13.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the commissioner may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by issuing guidance, without taking regulatory action, until the time regulations are
 adopted.

(j) By January 1, 2019, the commissioner shall provide a report to the Governor, the President pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the Assembly, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Health of the data and information provided in the independent dispute resolution process in a manner and format specified by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 278, Sec. 2.   (AB 2157)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.82.

(a) (1) For services rendered subject to Section 10112.8, effective July 1, 2017, unless otherwise agreed to by the noncontracting individual health professional and the insurer, the insurer shall reimburse the greater of the average contracted rate or 125 percent of the amount Medicare reimburses on a fee-for-service basis for the same or similar services in the general geographic region in which the services were rendered. For the purposes of this section, “average contracted rate” means the average of the contracted commercial rates paid by the health insurer for the same or similar services in the geographic region. This subdivision does not apply to subdivision (c) of Section 10112.8 or subdivision (b) of this
 section.

(2) (A) By July 1, 2017, each health insurer shall provide to the commissioner all of the following:

(i) Data listing its average contracted rates for the insurer for services most frequently subject to Section 10112.8 in each geographic region in which the services are rendered for the calendar year 2015.

(ii) Its methodology for determining the average contracted rate for the insurer for services subject to Section 10112.8. The methodology to determine an average contracted rate shall ensure that the insurer includes the highest and lowest contracted rates for the calendar year 2015.

(iii) The policies and procedures used to
 determine the average contracted rates under this subdivision.

(B) For each calendar year after the health insurer’s initial submission of the average contracted rate as specified in subparagraph (A) and until the standardized methodology under paragraph (3) is specified, a health insurer shall adjust the rate initially established pursuant to this subdivision by the Consumer Price Index for Medical Care Services, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(3) (A) By January 1, 2019, the commissioner shall specify a methodology that insurers shall use to determine the average contracted rates for services most frequently subject to Section 10112.8. This methodology shall take into account, at a minimum, information from the independent
 dispute resolution process, the specialty of the individual health professional, and the geographic region in which the services are rendered. The methodology to determine an average contracted rate shall ensure that the insurer includes the highest and lowest contracted rates.

(B) Insurers shall provide to the commissioner the policies and procedures used to determine the average contracted rates in compliance with subparagraph (A).

(C) The average contracted rate data submitted pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(D) In developing the standardized
 methodology under this subdivision, the commissioner shall consult with interested parties throughout the process of developing the standards, including the Department of Managed Health Care, representatives of health plans, insurers, health care providers, hospitals, consumer advocates, and other stakeholders it deems appropriate. The commissioner shall hold the first stakeholder meeting no later than July 1, 2017.

(4) A health insurer shall include in its reports submitted to the commissioner pursuant to Section 10133.5 and regulations adopted pursuant to that section, in a manner specified by the department, the number of payments made to noncontracting individual health professionals for services at a contracting health facility and subject to Section 10112.8, as well as other data sufficient to determine the proportion of
 noncontracting individual health professionals to contracting individual health professionals at contracting health facilities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 10112.8. The commissioner shall include a summary of this information in its January 1, 2019, report required pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 10112.81 and its findings regarding the impact of the act that added this section on health insurer contracting and network adequacy.

(5) A health insurer that provides services subject to Section 10112.8 shall meet the network adequacy requirements set forth in this chapter, including, but not limited to, Section 10133.5 of this code and Sections 2240.1 and 2240.7 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, including, but not limited to, inpatient hospital services and specialist physician services, and if
 necessary, the commissioner may adopt additional regulations related to those services. This section shall not be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority under this chapter.

(6) For the purposes of this section, for average contracted rates for individual and small group coverage, geographic region shall be the geographic regions listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10753.14. For purposes of this section for Medicare fee-for-service reimbursement, geographic regions shall be the geographic regions specified for physician reimbursement for Medicare fee-for-service by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(7) A health insurer shall authorize and permit assignment of the insured’s right, if any, to any reimbursement for
 health care services covered under the health insurance policy to a noncontracting individual health professional who furnishes the health care services rendered subject to Section 10112.8. Lack of assignment pursuant to this paragraph shall not be construed to limit the applicability of this section, Section 10112.8, or Section 10112.81.

(8) A noncontracting individual health professional or health insurer who disputes the claim reimbursement under this section shall utilize the independent dispute resolution process described in Section 10112.81.

(b) If nonemergency services are provided by a noncontracting individual health professional consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 10112.8 to an insured who has voluntarily chosen to use the insured’s out-of-network benefit
 for services covered by an
 insurer that includes coverage for out-of-network benefits, unless otherwise agreed to by the insurer and the noncontracting individual health professional, the amount paid by the insurer shall be the amount set forth in the insured’s policy. This payment is not subject to the independent dispute resolution process described in Section 10112.81.

(c) If a health insurer delegates the responsibility for payment of claims to a contracted entity, including, but not limited to, a medical group or independent practice association, then the entity to which that responsibility is delegated shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(d) (1) A payment made by the health insurer to the noncontracting health care professional for nonemergency
 services as required by Section 10112.8 and this section, in addition to the applicable cost sharing owed by the insured, shall constitute payment in full for nonemergency services rendered unless either party uses the dispute resolution process or other lawful means pursuant to Section 10112.81.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the amounts paid by an insurer for services under this section shall not constitute the prevailing or customary charges, the usual fees to the general public, or other charges for other payers for an individual health professional.

(3) This subdivision shall not preclude the use of the independent dispute resolution process pursuant to Section 10112.81.

(e) This section shall not
 apply to emergency services and care, as defined in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) The definitions in subdivision (f) of Section 10112.8 shall apply for purposes of this section.

(g) This section shall not be construed to alter a health insurer’s obligations pursuant to Section 10123.13.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 308.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.9.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10273.4, an insurer, except an insurer issuing a specialized health insurance policy, issuing a policy or certificate of health insurance, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 106, shall not market, offer, amend, issue, or renew a large group plan contract that provides a minimum value of less than 60 percent.

(2) This section shall not apply to limited wraparound coverage, that is
 consistent with Section 146.145(b) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. This section also shall not apply to a policy that provides coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government.

(3) This section shall not apply to a grandfathered health insurance policy that provides basic health care services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, without annual or lifetime limits for any of the basic health care services.

(b) For purposes of this section, a plan shall provide a minimum value of at least 60 percent, as described in Section 36B(c)(2)(C) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and any regulations or guidance adopted under that section.

(c) This section shall not apply to an insurer that is subject to the disclosure requirements described in Section 10198.61.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Large group” means a group that is not a “small employer,” as defined in Section 10753.

(2) “Plan year” has the meaning set forth in Section 144.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 617, Sec. 3.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.95.

(a) A health insurer shall provide an insured who has been displaced or whose health otherwise may be affected by a state of emergency, as declared by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or a health emergency, as declared by the State Public Health Officer pursuant to Section 101080 of the Health and Safety Code, access to medically necessary health care services.

(b) Within 48 hours of a declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency or a declaration by the State Public Health Officer of a health emergency that displaces, or has the immediate potential to displace, insureds or health care providers, or that otherwise affects, or may
 affect, health care providers or the health of insureds, a health insurer operating in the county or counties included in the declaration shall file with the department a notification describing whether the insurer has experienced or expects to experience any disruption to the operation of the insurer, explaining how the insurer is communicating with potentially impacted insureds, and summarizing the actions the insurer has taken or is in the process of taking to ensure that the health care needs of insureds are met. The department may require the insurer to take actions, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Shorten time limits for health insurers to approve prior authorization, precertification, or referrals, and extend the time that prior authorizations, precertifications, and referrals remain valid.

(2) Extend filing deadlines for claims.

(3) Suspend prescription refill limitations and allow an impacted insured to refill their prescriptions at an out-of-network pharmacy.

(4) Authorize an insured to replace medical equipment or supplies.

(5) Allow an insured to access an appropriate out-of-network provider if an in-network provider is unavailable due to the state of emergency or if the insured is out of the area due to displacement.

(6) Have a toll-free telephone number that an affected insured may call for answers to questions, including questions about the loss of health insurance
 identification cards, access to prescription refills, or how to access health care.

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the Governor’s authority under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), or the commissioner’s authority under any provision of this part.

(d) The commissioner may issue guidance to insurers regarding compliance with this section during the first three years following the declaration of emergency, or until the emergency is terminated, whichever occurs first. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.

Every policy of life, disability, or life and disability insurance issued or delivered within this State on or after the first day of January, 1936, by any insurer doing such business within this State shall contain and be deemed to constitute the entire contract between the parties and nothing shall be incorporated therein by reference to any constitution, by-laws, rules, application or other writings, of either of the parties thereto or of any other person, unless the same are indorsed upon or attached to the policy; and all statements purporting to be made by the insured shall, in the absence of fraud, be representations and not warranties. Any waiver of the provisions of this section shall be void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 245.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.1.

The following provisions shall apply to this act:

(a) “Advertisement” means any written, electronic, or printed communication or any communication by means of recorded telephone messages or transmitted on radio, television, the Internet, or similar communications media, including film strips, motion pictures, and videos, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of creating an interest in or inducing a person to purchase or sell, assign, devise, bequest, or transfer the death benefit or ownership of a life insurance policy or an interest in a life insurance policy pursuant to a life settlement contract.

(b) “Broker” means a person who, on
 behalf of an owner, and for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, offers or attempts to negotiate life settlement contracts between an owner and providers. A broker represents only the owner and owes a fiduciary duty to the owner to act according to the owner’s instructions, and in the best interest of the owner, notwithstanding the manner in which the broker is compensated. A broker does not include an attorney, certified public accountant, or financial planner retained in the type of practice customarily performed in his or her professional capacity to represent the owner whose compensation is not paid directly or indirectly by the provider or any other person, except the owner.

(c) “Business of life settlements” means an activity involved in, but not limited to, offering to enter into, soliciting, negotiating, procuring, effectuating, monitoring, or tracking of life settlement contracts.

(d) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner.

(e) “Financing entity” means an underwriter, placement agent, lender, purchaser of securities, purchaser of a policy or certificate from a provider, credit enhancer, or any entity that has a direct ownership in a policy or certificate that is the subject of a life settlement contract, as to which both of the following apply:

(1) It is an entity whose principal activity related to the transaction is providing funds to effect the life settlement contract or purchase of one or more policies.

(2) It is an entity that has an agreement in writing with one or more providers to finance the acquisition of life settlement contracts.

(f) “Financing
 transaction” means a transaction in which a licensed provider obtains financing from a financing entity, including, without limitation, any secured or unsecured financing, any securitization transaction, or any securities offering which either is registered or exempt from registration under federal and state securities law.

(g) “Fraudulent life settlement act” includes all of the following:

(1) Acts or omissions committed by any person that, for the purpose of depriving another of property or for pecuniary gain, commits or permits its employees or its agents to engage in acts, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Presenting, causing to be presented, or preparing with knowledge and belief that it will be presented to or by a provider, premium finance lender, broker, insurer, insurance producer, or any
 other person, false material information, or concealing material information, as part of, in support of, or concerning a fact material to one or more of the following:

(i) An application for the issuance of a life settlement contract or insurance policy.

(ii) The underwriting of a life settlement contract or insurance policy.

(iii) A claim for payment or benefit pursuant to a life settlement contract or insurance policy.

(iv) Premiums paid on an insurance policy.

(v) Payments and changes in ownership or beneficiary made in accordance with the terms of a life settlement contract or insurance policy.

(vi) The reinstatement or
 conversion of an insurance policy.

(vii) The solicitation, offer to enter into, or effectuation of, a life settlement contract or insurance policy.

(viii) The issuance of written evidence of life settlement contracts or insurance.

(ix) Any application for, or the existence of or any payments related to, a loan secured directly or indirectly by any interest in a life insurance policy.

(B) Entering into stranger-originated life insurance (STOLI).

(C) Employing any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud in the business of life settlements.

(2) Any of the following that any person does, or permits his or her employees or agents
 to do, in the furtherance of a fraud, or to prevent the detection of a fraud:

(A) Remove, conceal, alter, destroy, or sequester from the commissioner the assets or records of a licensee or other person engaged in the business of life settlements.

(B) Misrepresent or conceal the financial condition of a licensee, financing entity, insurer, or other person.

(C) Transact the business of life settlements in violation of laws requiring a license, certificate of authority, or other legal authority for the transaction of the business of life settlements.

(D) File with the commissioner or the chief insurance regulatory official of another jurisdiction a document containing false information or otherwise concealing information about a material fact from the
 commissioner.

(E) Engage in embezzlement, theft, misappropriation, or conversion of moneys, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of a provider, insurer, insured, owner, insurance policyowner, or any other person engaged in the business of life settlements or insurance.

(F) Enter into, broker, or otherwise deal in a life settlement contract, the subject of which is a life insurance policy that was obtained by presenting false information concerning any fact material to the policy or by concealing, for the purpose of misleading another, information requested concerning any fact material to the policy, where the owner or the owner’s agent intended to defraud the policy’s issuer.

(G) Attempt to commit, assist, aid, or abet in the commission of, or conspiracy to commit the acts or omissions specified in this
 subdivision.

(H) Misrepresent the state of residence of an owner to be a state or jurisdiction that does not have a law substantially similar to this act for the purpose of evading or avoiding the provisions of this act.

(h) “Insured” means the person covered under the policy being considered for sale in a life settlement contract.

(i) “Life expectancy” means the arithmetic mean of the number of months the insured under the life insurance policy to be settled can be expected to live considering medical records and appropriate experiential data.

(j) “Life insurance producer” means any person licensed in this state as a resident or nonresident insurance agent who has received qualification or authority for life insurance coverage or a life line of
 coverage pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(k) “Life settlement contract” means a written agreement solicited, negotiated, or entered into in this state between a provider and an owner, establishing the terms under which compensation or any thing of value will be paid, which compensation or thing of value is less than the expected death benefit of the insurance policy or certificate, in return for the owner’s assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of the death benefit or any portion of an insurance policy or certificate of insurance for compensation, provided, however, that the minimum value for a life settlement contract shall be greater than a cash surrender value or accelerated death benefit available at the time of an application for a life settlement contract. “Life settlement contract” also includes the transfer for compensation or value of ownership or beneficial interest in a trust or
 other entity that owns such policy if the trust or other entity was formed or availed of for the principal purpose of acquiring one or more life insurance contracts, which life insurance contract is owned by a person residing in this state.

(1) A “life settlement contract” includes a premium finance loan made for a policy on or before the date of issuance of the policy where one or more of the following conditions apply:

(A) The loan proceeds are not used solely to pay premiums for the policy and any costs or expenses incurred by the lender or the borrower in connection with the financing.

(B) The owner receives on the date of the premium finance loan a guarantee of the future life settlement value of the policy.

(C) The owner agrees on the date of the
 premium finance loan to sell the policy or any portion of the policy’s death benefit on any date following the issuance of the policy, not including an agreement to sell the policy in the event of a default, provided that the default is not pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any other person for the purpose of evading regulation under this act.

(2) “Life settlement contract” does not include any of the following:

(A) A policy loan by a life insurance company pursuant to the terms of the life insurance policy or accelerated death provisions contained in the life insurance policy, whether issued with the original policy or as a rider.

(B) A premium finance loan, as defined herein, or any loan made by a bank or other licensed financial institution, provided that neither default on the loan nor the transfer
 of the policy in connection with the default is pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any other person for the purpose of evading regulation under this act.

(C) A collateral assignment of a life insurance policy by an owner.
